trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo.found.dix
<pardef n="tema__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tana</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tanas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ordförande__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hobb/y__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yn</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yns</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yer</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yers</l>      <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerna</l>     <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesarna</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yernas</l>    <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesarnas</l>  <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pris__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="test__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="garage__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="lack">            <i>lack</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="ordförande">      <i>ordförande</i><par n="ordförande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fossil">          <i>fossil</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="hobby">           <i>hobb</i><par n="hobb/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="individ">         <i>individ</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="nobelpris">       <i>nobelpris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pris">            <i>pris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="efterled">        <i>efterled</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="intervall">       <i>intervall</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="garage">          <i>garage</i><par n="garage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="polynom">         <i>polynom</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="förled">          <i>förled</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="tema">            <i>tema</i><par n="tema__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="test">            <i>test</i><par n="test__n_v"/></e>
